Russian-English Bilingual.aff
SFX 148 Y 435
SFX 148   чь   жешь         чь
SFX 148   чь   жете         чь
SFX 148   чь   жет          чь
SFX 148   чь   жем          чь
SFX 148   чь   гут          чь
SFX 148   чь   гу           чь
SFX 148   заться жутся        заться
SFX 148   заться жусь         заться
SFX 148   заться жешься       заться
SFX 148   заться жется        заться
SFX 148   заться жетесь       заться
SFX 148   заться жемся        заться
SFX 148   зать жут          зать
SFX 148   зать жу           зать
SFX 148   зать жешь         зать
SFX 148   зать жете         зать
SFX 148   зать жет          зать
SFX 148   зать жем          зать
SFX 148   ыться удутся       быться
SFX 148   ыться удусь        быться
SFX 148   ыться удешься      быться
SFX 148   ыться удется       быться
SFX 148   ыться удетесь      быться
SFX 148   ыться удемся       быться
SFX 148   ыть  удут         быть
SFX 148   ыть  уду          быть
SFX 148   ыть  удешь        быть
SFX 148   ыть  удете        быть
SFX 148   ыть  удет         быть
SFX 148   ыть  удем         быть
SFX 148   ваться овутся       зваться
SFX 148   ваться овусь        зваться
SFX 148   ваться овешься      зваться
SFX 148   ваться овется       зваться
SFX 148   ваться оветесь      зваться
SFX 148   ваться овемся       зваться
SFX 148   ваться овёшься      зваться
SFX 148   ваться овётся       зваться
SFX 148   ваться овётесь      зваться
SFX 148   ваться овёмся       зваться
SFX 148   вать овут         звать
SFX 148   вать ову          звать
SFX 148   вать овешь        звать
SFX 148   вать овете        звать
SFX 148   вать овет         звать
SFX 148   вать овем         звать
SFX 148   вать овёшь        звать
SFX 148   вать овёте        звать
SFX 148   вать овёт         звать
SFX 148   вать овём         звать
SFX 148   жаться гутся        жаться
SFX 148   жаться гусь         жаться
SFX 148   жать гут          жать
SFX 148   жать гу           жать
SFX 148   ться шься         даться
SFX 148   ться вутся        лыться
SFX 148   ться вусь         лыться
SFX 148   ться вешься       лыться
SFX 148   ться вется        лыться
SFX 148   ться ветесь       лыться
SFX 148   ться вемся        лыться
SFX 148   ться вёшься       лыться
SFX 148   ться вётся        лыться
SFX 148   ться вётесь       лыться
SFX 148   ться вёмся        лыться
SFX 148   ться стся         даться
SFX 148   ться нутся        статься
SFX 148   ться нусь         статься
SFX 148   ться нешься       статься
SFX 148   ться нется        статься
SFX 148   ться нетесь       статься
SFX 148   ться немся        статься
SFX 148   ться мся          даться
SFX 148   ться дутся        даться
SFX 148   ться дитесь       даться
SFX 148   ться димся        даться
SFX 148   ть   шь           дать
SFX 148   ть   вут          лыть
SFX 148   ть   ву           лыть
SFX 148   ть   вешь         лыть
SFX 148   ть   вете         лыть
SFX 148   ть   вет          лыть
SFX 148   ть   вем          лыть
SFX 148   ть   вёшь         лыть
SFX 148   ть   вёте         лыть
SFX 148   ть   вёт          лыть
SFX 148   ть   вём          лыть
SFX 148   ть   ут           лезть
SFX 148   ть   у            лезть
SFX 148   ть   ст           дать
SFX 148   ть   нут          стать
SFX 148   ть   ну           стать
SFX 148   ть   нешь         стать
SFX 148   ть   нете         стать
SFX 148   ть   нет          стать
SFX 148   ть   нем          стать
SFX 148   ть   м            дать
SFX 148   ть   ешь          лезть
SFX 148   ть   ете          лезть
SFX 148   ть   ет           лезть
SFX 148   ть   ем           лезть
SFX 148   ть   дут          дать
SFX 148   ть   дите         дать
SFX 148   ть   дим          дать
SFX 148   таться чутся        [^с]таться
SFX 148   таться чусь         [^с]таться
SFX 148   таться чешься       [^с]таться
SFX 148   таться чется        [^с]таться
SFX 148   таться четесь       [^с]таться
SFX 148   таться чемся        [^с]таться
SFX 148   тать чут          [^с]тать
SFX 148   тать чу           [^с]тать
SFX 148   тать чешь         [^с]тать
SFX 148   тать чете         [^с]тать
SFX 148   тать чет          [^с]тать
SFX 148   тать чем          [^с]тать
SFX 148   сться дутся        асться
SFX 148   сться дусь         асться
SFX 148   сться дешься       асться
SFX 148   сться дется        асться
SFX 148   сться детесь       асться
SFX 148   сться демся        асться
SFX 148   сться дёшься       асться
SFX 148   сться дётся        асться
SFX 148   сться дётесь       асться
SFX 148   сться дёмся        асться
SFX 148   сть  дут          асть
SFX 148   сть  ду           асть
SFX 148   сть  дешь         асть
SFX 148   сть  дете         асть
SFX 148   сть  дет          асть
SFX 148   сть  дем          асть
SFX 148   сть  дёшь         асть
SFX 148   сть  дёте         асть
SFX 148   сть  дёт          асть
SFX 148   сть  дём          асть
SFX 148   стись тутся        лестись
SFX 148   стись тусь         лестись
SFX 148   стись тешься       лестись
SFX 148   стись тется        лестись
SFX 148   стись тетесь       лестись
SFX 148   стись темся        лестись
SFX 148   стись тёшься       лестись
SFX 148   стись тётся        лестись
SFX 148   стись тётесь       лестись
SFX 148   стись тёмся        лестись
SFX 148   стись дутся        вестись
SFX 148   стись дусь         вестись
SFX 148   стись дешься       вестись
SFX 148   стись дется        вестись
SFX 148   стись детесь       вестись
SFX 148   стись демся        вестись
SFX 148   стись дёшься       вестись
SFX 148   стись дётся        вестись
SFX 148   стись дётесь       вестись
SFX 148   стись дёмся        вестись
SFX 148   сти  тут          лести
SFX 148   сти  ту           лести
SFX 148   сти  тешь         лести
SFX 148   сти  тете         лести
SFX 148   сти  тет          лести
SFX 148   сти  тем          лести
SFX 148   сти  тёшь         лести
SFX 148   сти  тёте         лести
SFX 148   сти  тёт          лести
SFX 148   сти  тём          лести
SFX 148   сти  дут          вести
SFX 148   сти  ду           вести
SFX 148   сти  дешь         вести
SFX 148   сти  дете         вести
SFX 148   сти  дет          вести
SFX 148   сти  дем          вести
SFX 148   сти  дёшь         вести
SFX 148   сти  дёте         вести
SFX 148   сти  дёт          вести
SFX 148   сти  дём          вести
SFX 148   сти  бут          рести
SFX 148   сти  бу           рести
SFX 148   сти  бешь         рести
SFX 148   сти  бете         рести
SFX 148   сти  бет          рести
SFX 148   сти  бем          рести
SFX 148   сти  бёшь         рести
SFX 148   сти  бёте         рести
SFX 148   сти  бёт          рести
SFX 148   сти  бём          рести
SFX 148   слаться шлешься      слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлется       слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлетесь      слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлемся       слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлются       слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлюсь        слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлёшься      слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлётся       слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлётесь      слаться
SFX 148   слаться шлёмся       слаться
SFX 148   слать шлешь        слать
SFX 148   слать шлете        слать
SFX 148   слать шлет         слать
SFX 148   слать шлем         слать
SFX 148   слать шлют         слать
SFX 148   слать шлю          слать
SFX 148   слать шлёшь        слать
SFX 148   слать шлёте        слать
SFX 148   слать шлёт         слать
SFX 148   слать шлём         слать
SFX 148   скаться щутся        скаться
SFX 148   скаться щусь         скаться
SFX 148   скаться щешься       скаться
SFX 148   скаться щется        скаться
SFX 148   скаться щетесь       скаться
SFX 148   скаться щемся        скаться
SFX 148   скать щут          скать
SFX 148   скать щу           скать
SFX 148   скать щешь         скать
SFX 148   скать щете         скать
SFX 148   скать щет          скать
SFX 148   скать щем          скать
SFX 148   сеть шу           сеть
SFX 148   саться шутся        [^о]саться
SFX 148   саться шусь         [^о]саться
SFX 148   саться шешься       [^о]саться
SFX 148   саться шется        [^о]саться
SFX 148   саться шетесь       [^о]саться
SFX 148   саться шемся        [^о]саться
SFX 148   сать шут          [^о]сать
SFX 148   сать шу           [^о]сать
SFX 148   сать шешь         [^о]сать
SFX 148   сать шете         [^о]сать
SFX 148   сать шет          [^о]сать
SFX 148   сать шем          [^о]сать
SFX 148   раться рутся        [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться русь         [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться решься       [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться рется        [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ретесь       [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ремся        [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться рёшься       [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться рётся        [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться рётесь       [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться рёмся        [^бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерутся       [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерусь        [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерешься      [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерется       [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться еретесь      [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться еремся       [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерёшься      [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерётся       [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерётесь      [бд]раться
SFX 148   раться ерёмся       [бд]раться
SFX 148   рать рут          [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ру           [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать решь         [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рете         [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рет          [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рем          [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рёшь         [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рёте         [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рёт          [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать рём          [^бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерут         [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать еру          [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерешь        [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерете        [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерет         [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерем         [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерёшь        [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерёте        [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерёт         [бд]рать
SFX 148   рать ерём         [бд]рать
SFX 148   яться нутся        мяться
SFX 148   яться нусь         мяться
SFX 148   яться нешься       мяться
SFX 148   яться нется        мяться
SFX 148   яться нетесь       мяться
SFX 148   яться немся        мяться
SFX 148   яться нёшься       мяться
SFX 148   яться нётся        мяться
SFX 148   яться нётесь       мяться
SFX 148   яться нёмся        мяться
SFX 148   ять  нут          мять
SFX 148   ять  ну           мять
SFX 148   ять  нешь         мять
SFX 148   ять  нете         мять
SFX 148   ять  нет          мять
SFX 148   ять  нем          мять
SFX 148   ять  нёшь         мять
SFX 148   ять  нёте         мять
SFX 148   ять  нёт          мять
SFX 148   ять  нём          мять
SFX 148   наться онятся       гнаться
SFX 148   наться онишься      гнаться
SFX 148   наться онится       гнаться
SFX 148   наться онитесь      гнаться
SFX 148   наться онимся       гнаться
SFX 148   наться онюсь        гнаться
SFX 148   нать онят         гнать
SFX 148   нать онишь        гнать
SFX 148   нать оните        гнать
SFX 148   нать онит         гнать
SFX 148   нать оним         гнать
SFX 148   нать оню          гнать
SFX 148   каться чутся        [^с]каться
SFX 148   каться чусь         [^с]каться
SFX 148   каться чешься       [^с]каться
SFX 148   каться чется        [^с]каться
SFX 148   каться четесь       [^с]каться
SFX 148   каться чемся        [^с]каться
SFX 148   кать чут          [^с]кать
SFX 148   кать чу           [^с]кать
SFX 148   кать чешь         [^с]кать
SFX 148   кать чете         [^с]кать
SFX 148   кать чет          [^с]кать
SFX 148   кать чем          [^с]кать
SFX 148   ить  ешь          лить
SFX 148   ить  ете          лить
SFX 148   ить  ет           лить
SFX 148   ить  ем           лить
SFX 148   ить  ют           лить
SFX 148   ить  ю            лить
SFX 148   и    ут           расти
SFX 148   и    у            расти
SFX 148   и    ешь          расти
SFX 148   и    ете          расти
SFX 148   и    ет           расти
SFX 148   и    ем           расти
SFX 148   и    ёшь          расти
SFX 148   и    ёте          расти
SFX 148   и    ёт           расти
SFX 148   и    ём           расти
SFX 148   хаться шутся        хаться
SFX 148   хаться шусь         хаться
